Utah statutes.
34A-2-505.   Loss of hearing -- Compensation for permanent partial disability.

(1)  Compensation for permanent partial disability for binaural hearing loss shall be determined by multiplying the percentage of binaural hearing loss by 109 weeks of compensation benefits as provided in this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.

(2)  When an employee files one or more claims for hearing loss the percentage of hearing loss previously found to exist shall be deducted from any subsequent award by the commission.

(3)  In no event shall compensation benefits be paid for total or 100% binaural hearing loss exceeding 109 weeks of compensation benefits.

